Utah statutes.
19-8-108.   Voluntary agreement -- Procedure and establishment.
(1) (a)  Before the executive director may evaluate any detailed plan or
report regarding the remediation goals and proposed methods of remediation,
the applicant and the executive director shall have entered into a voluntary
cleanup agreement under this chapter.
(b)  The agreement shall establish the terms and conditions for the evaluation
of investigation, remediation, and status reports.
(2)  Before the applicant may initiate any response action covered by an
agreement, a voluntary cleanup agreement shall have been signed by the
applicant and the executive director, except that the applicant may take
emergency measures as necessary, but shall coordinate these measures with the
appropriate emergency response authorities.
(3)  A voluntary cleanup agreement shall provide for:
(a)  recovery by the department of all reasonable costs:
(i)  incurred in the voluntary cleanup in the review and oversight of the
applicant's work plan and reports and as a result of the department's field
activities regarding the cleanup;
(ii)  attributable to the voluntary cleanup agreement; and
(iii)  in excess of the amount of fees submitted by the applicant under
Section 19-8-107; and
(b)  a schedule of payments by the applicant to the department, to be made by
the applicant for recovery of all department costs attributable to the
voluntary cleanup program, including:
(i)  direct and indirect costs of overhead, salaries, equipment, and
utilities;
(ii)  legal, management, and support costs; and
(iii)  appropriate tasks, deliverables, and schedules.
(4)  A voluntary cleanup agreement shall:
(a)  identify all statutes and rules with which the applicant shall comply;
(b)  describe any work plan or report the applicant shall submit to the
executive director for review, including a final report that provides all
information necessary for the executive director to confirm that all work
contemplated by the voluntary cleanup agreement has been completed;
(c)  include a schedule for submitting the information required by Subsection
(4)(b); and
(d)  state the technical standards to be applied in evaluating the work plans
and reports.
(5)  If an agreement under this section is not established between the
applicant and the executive director within 30 days after good faith
negotiations between the parties have been initiated:
(a)  the applicant or the executive director may, upon providing written
notice to the other party, withdraw from the negotiations; and
(b)  the applicant's application fee is not refundable.
(6)  The department may not initiate an enforcement action against an
applicant regarding a contamination or release, or any activity that resulted
in the contamination or release if the applicant:
(a)  is in compliance with this chapter regarding the contamination or
release; and
(b)  has entered into a voluntary cleanup agreement that is in effect under
this chapter regarding the contamination or release.
